Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.24.010

Fee determination.

(1) The compensation arrangement between a client and a trustee or any other fiduciary pursuant to this title shall be at arm's length and any compensation pursuant to such arrangement shall be a reasonable amount with respect to the services rendered.

(2) This section does not apply to arrangements not involving trust or client assets.

[ 2014 c 37 s 364.]